West Virginia, session 2026, HB5331.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 22A. WEST VIRGINIA MUNICIPAL POLICE OFFICERS AND FIREFIGHTERS RETIREMENT SYSTEM. §8-22A-2. Definitions. As used in this article, unless a federal law or regulation or the context clearly requires a different meaning:(a) "Accrued benefit" means on behalf of any member 2.75 percent per year of the member’s final average salary for the first 20 years of credited service. Additionally, 2 percent per year for 21 through 25 years and 1.5 percent per year for each year over 25 years will be credited with a maximum benefit of 90 percent of a member’s final average salary. A member’s accrued benefit may not exceed the limits of Section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code and is subject to the provisions of §8-22A-10 of this code.(b) "Accumulated contributions" means the sum of all retirement contributions deducted from the compensation of a member or paid on his or her behalf as a result of covered employment, together with regular interest on the deducted amounts.(c) "Active military duty" means full-time duty in the active military service of the United States Army, Navy, Air Force, Space Force, Coast Guard, or Marine Corps. The term does not include regularly required training or other duty performed by a member of a reserve component or National Guard unless the member can substantiate that he or she was called into the full-time active military service of the United States and has received no compensation during the period of that duty from any board or employer other than the armed forces.(d) "Actuarial equivalent" means a benefit of equal value computed on the basis of the mortality table and interest rates as set and adopted by the board in accordance with the provisions of this article: Provided, That when used in the context of compliance with the federal maximum benefit requirements of Section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code, "actuarial equivalent" shall be computed using the mortality tables and interest rates required to comply with those requirements.(e) "Annual compensation" means the wages paid to the member during covered employment within the meaning of Section 3401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, but determined without regard to any rules that limit the remuneration included in wages based on the nature or location of employment or services performed during the plan year plus amounts excluded under Section 414(h)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code and less reimbursements or other expense allowances, cash or noncash fringe benefits, or both, deferred compensation and welfare benefits. Annual compensation for determining benefits during any determination period may not exceed the maximum compensation allowed as adjusted for cost-of-living in accordance with §5-10D-7 of this code and Section 401(a) (17) of the Internal Revenue Code.(f) "Annual leave service" means accrued annual leave.(g) "Annuity starting date" means the first day of the month for which an annuity is payable after submission of a retirement application or the required beginning date, if earlier. For purposes of this subsection, if retirement income payments commence after the normal retirement age, "retirement" means the first day of the month following or coincident with the latter of the last day the member worked in covered employment or the member’s normal retirement age and after completing proper written application for retirement on an application supplied by the board.(h) "Beneficiary" means a natural person who is entitled to, or will be entitled to, an annuity or other benefit payable by the plan.(i) "Board" means the Consolidated Public Retirement Board.(j) "Bona fide separation from service upon retirement" means that a retirant has completely terminated any employment relationship with any participating public employer in the plan for a period of at least 60 consecutive days from the effective date of retirement and without a prearranged agreement to return to employment with a participating public employer.  For purposes of this definition, an employment relationship includes employment in any capacity, whether on a permanent, full-time, part-time, substitute, per diem, temporary or leased employee basis.(k) "Covered employment" means: (1) Employment as a full-time municipal police officer or firefighter and the active performance of the duties required of that employment; or (2) ­Employment as a full-time campus police officer as described in §18B-4-5 of this code and the active performance of the duties required of that employment; or (3) The period of time during which active duties are not performed but disability benefits are received under this article; or  (4) Concurrent employment by a municipal police officer or firefighter or a campus police officer in a job or jobs in addition to his or her employment as a municipal police officer or firefighter or a campus police officer in this plan where the secondary employment requires the police officer or firefighter to be a member of another retirement system which is administered by the Consolidated Public Retirement Board pursuant to this code: Provided, That the police officer or firefighter contributes to the fund created in this article the amount specified as the member’s contribution in §8-22A-8 of this code.(l) "Credited service" means the sum of a member’s years of service, active military duty, and disability service.(m) "Dependent child" means: (1) An unmarried person under age 18 who is: (A) A natural child of the member; (B) A legally adopted child of the member; (C) A child who at the time of the member’s death was living with the member while the member was an adopting parent during any period of probation; or (D) A stepchild of the member residing in the member’s household at the time of the member’s death; or (2) Any unmarried child under age 23: (A) Who is enrolled as a full-time student in an accredited college or university; (B) Who was claimed as a dependent by the member for federal income tax purposes at the time of the member’s death; and (C) Whose relationship with the member is described in paragraph (A), (B) or (C), subdivision (1) of this subsection.(n) "Dependent parent" means the father or mother of the member who was claimed as a dependent by the member for federal income tax purposes at the time of the member’s death.(o) "Disability service" means service credit received by a member, expressed in whole years, fractions thereof, or both, equal to one half of the whole years, fractions thereof, or both, during which time a member receives disability benefits under this article.(p) "Effective date" means January 1, 2010.(q) "Employer error" means an omission, misrepresentation or deliberate act in violation of relevant provisions of the West Virginia Code or of the West Virginia Code of State Regulations or the relevant provisions of both the West Virginia Code and of the West Virginia Code of State Regulations by the participating public employer that has resulted in an underpayment or overpayment of contributions required.(r) "Final average salary" means the average of the highest annual compensation received for covered employment by the member during any five consecutive plan years within the member’s last 10 years of service while employed, prior to any disability payment. If the member did not have annual compensation for the five full plan years preceding the member’s attainment of normal retirement age and during that period the member received disability benefits under this article, then "final average salary" means the average of the monthly compensation which the member was receiving in the plan year prior to the initial disability. "Final average salary" does not include any lump sum payment for unused, accrued leave of any kind or character.(s) "Full-time employment" means permanent employment of an employee by a participating public employer in a position which normally requires 12 months per year service and requires at least 1,040 hours per year service in that position.(t) "Fund" means the West Virginia Municipal Police Officers and Firefighters Retirement Fund created by this article.(u) "Hour of service" means: (1) Each hour for which a member is paid or entitled to payment for covered employment during which time active duties are performed. These hours shall be credited to the member for the plan year in which the duties are performed; and (2) Each hour for which a member is paid or entitled to payment for covered employment during a plan year but where no duties are performed due to vacation, holiday, illness, incapacity including disability, layoff, jury duty, military duty, leave of absence, or any combination thereof and without regard to whether the employment relationship has terminated. Hours under this subdivision shall be calculated and credited pursuant to West Virginia Division of Labor rules. A member may not be credited with any hours of service for any period of time he or she is receiving benefits under §8-22A-17 and §8-22A-18 of this code; and (3) Each hour for which back pay is either awarded or agreed to be paid by the participating public employer, irrespective of mitigation of damages. The same hours of service may not be credited both under subdivision (1) or (2) of this subsection and under this subdivision. Hours under this paragraph shall be credited to the member for the plan year or years to which the award or agreement pertains, rather than the plan year in which the award, agreement or payment is made.(v) "Medical examination" means an in-person or virtual examination of a member’s physical or mental health, or both, by a physician or physicians selected or approved by the board; or, at the discretion of the board, a medical record review of the member’s physical or mental health, or both, by a physician selected or approved by the board.(w) "Member" means, except as provided in §8-22A-32 §8-22A-33, or §8-22A-33a of this code, a person hired as a municipal police officer or municipal firefighter, as defined in this section, by a participating public employer on or after January 1, 2010, or a campus police officer as described in §18B-4-5 of this code who is hired after January 1, 2026, or who was hired before that date but elects to become a member as described in that section. A member shall remain a member until the benefits to which he or she is entitled under this article are paid or forfeited.(x) "Monthly salary" means the W-2 reportable compensation received by a member during the month.(y) "Municipality" has the meaning ascribed to it in this code.(z) (1) "Municipal police officer" means an individual employed as a member of a paid police department by a West Virginia municipality or municipal subdivision which has established and maintains a municipal policemen’s pension and relief fund, and who is not a member of, and not eligible for membership in, a municipal policemen’s pension and relief fund as provided in §8-22-16 of this code: Provided, That municipal police officer also means an individual employed as a member of a paid police department by a West Virginia municipality or municipal subdivision which is authorized to elect to participate in the plan pursuant to §8-22A-33 or §8-22A-33a of this code. Paid police department does not mean a department whose employees are paid nominal salaries or wages or are paid only for services actually rendered on an hourly basis.(2) "Municipal firefighter" means an individual employed as a member of a paid fire department by a West Virginia municipality or municipal subdivision which has established and maintains a municipal firemen’s pension and relief fund, and who is not a member of, and not eligible for membership in, a municipal firemen’s pension and relief fund as provided in §8-22-16 of this code: Provided, That municipal firefighter also means an individual employed as a member of a paid fire department by a West Virginia municipality or municipal subdivision which is authorized to elect to participate in the plan pursuant to §8-22A-33 or §8-22A-33a of this code. Paid fire department does not mean a department whose employees are paid nominal salaries or wages or are paid only for services actually rendered on an hourly basis: Provided, That special consideration shall be given for municipalities to join the Municipal Police Officers & Firefighters Retirement System (MPFRS) for their paid firefighters.(aa) "Municipal subdivision" means any separate corporation or instrumentality established by one or more municipalities, as permitted by law; and any public corporation charged by law with the performance of a governmental function and whose jurisdiction is coextensive with one or more municipalities.(bb) "Normal form" means a monthly annuity which is one twelfth of the amount of the member’s accrued benefit which is payable for the member’s life. If the member dies before the sum of the payments he or she receives equals his or her accumulated contributions on the annuity starting date, the named beneficiary shall receive in one lump sum the difference between the accumulated contributions at the annuity starting date and the total of the retirement income payments made to the member.(cc) "Normal retirement age" means the first to occur of the following: (1) Attainment of age 50 years and the completion of 20 or more years of regular contributory service; (2) while still in covered employment, attainment of at least age 50 years and when the sum of current age plus regular contributory service equals or exceeds 70 years; (3) while still in covered employment, attainment of at least age 60 years and completion of 10 years of regular contributory service; or (4) attainment of age 62 years and completion of five or more years of regular contributory service.(dd) "Participating public employer" means a municipality, municipal subdivision participating in the plan or an institution of higher education. (ee) "Plan" means the West Virginia Municipal Police Officers and Firefighters Retirement System established by this article.(ff) "Plan year" means the 12-month period commencing on January 1 of any designated year and ending the following December 31.(gg) "Qualified public safety employee" means any employee of a participating state or political subdivision who provides police protection, firefighting services or emergency medical services for any area within the jurisdiction of the state or political subdivision, or such other meaning given to the term by Section 72(t) (10) (B) of the Internal Revenue Code or by Treasury Regulation §1.401(a)-1(b) (2) (v) as they may be amended from time to time.(hh) "Regular contributory service" means a member’s credited service excluding active military duty, disability service and accrued annual and sick leave service.(ii) "Regular interest" means the rate or rates of interest per annum, compounded annually, as the board adopts in accordance with the provisions of this article.(jj) "Required beginning date" means April 1 of the calendar year following the later of: (1) The calendar year in which the member attains (1) the calendar year in which the member attains the applicable age as set forth in this paragraph; or(2) The calendar year in which he or she retires or otherwise separates from covered employment.The applicable age is:(A) Seventy-two, if the individual attains age 72 prior to January 1, 2023;(B) Seventy-three, if the individual attains age 72 after December 31, 2022, and attains age 73 before January 1, 2033; or (C) Seventy-five, if the individual attains age 74 after December 31, 2032; Provided, That the applicable age shall be determined in accordance with the provisions of §401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code and the Treasury Regulations thereunder, as the same may be amended from time to time.(kk) "Retirant" means any member who commences an annuity payable by the plan.(ll) "Retirement income payments" means the monthly retirement income payments payable.(mm) "Spouse" means the person to whom the member is legally married on the annuity starting date.(nn) "Surviving spouse" means the person to whom the member was legally married at the time of the member’s death and who survived the member.(oo) "Totally disabled" means a member’s inability to engage in substantial gainful activity by reason of any medically determined physical or mental impairment that can be expected to result in death or that has lasted or can be expected to last for a continuous period of not less than 12 months. For purposes of this subsection: (1) A member is totally disabled only if his or her physical or mental impairment or impairments are so severe that he or she is not only unable to perform his or her previous work as a police officer or firefighter but also cannot, considering his or her age, education and work experience, engage in any other kind of substantial gainful employment which exists in the state regardless of whether: (A) The work exists in the immediate area in which the member lives; (B) A specific job vacancy exists; or (C) The member would be hired if he or she applied for work. For purposes of this article, substantial gainful employment is the same definition as used by the United States Social Security Administration; and (2) "Physical or mental impairment" is an impairment that results from an anatomical, physiological or psychological abnormality that is demonstrated by medically accepted clinical and laboratory diagnostic techniques. The board may require submission of a member’s annual tax return for purposes of monitoring the earnings limitation.(pp) "Vested" means eligible for retirement income payments after completion of five or more years of regular contributory service.(qq) "Year of service" means a member shall, except in his or her first and last years of covered employment, be credited with years of service credit based on the hours of service performed as covered employment and credited to the member during the plan year based on the following schedule:Hours of Service  	Year of Service CreditedLess than 500  			0500 to 999 				1/31,000 to 1,499 			2/31,500 or more  			1During a member’s first and last years of covered employment, the member shall be credited with one twelfth of a year of service for each month during the plan year in which the member is credited with an hour of service for which contributions were received by the fund. A member is not entitled to credit for years of service for any time period during which he or she received disability payments under §8-22A-17 and §8-22A-18 of this code. §8-22A-16. Refunds to certain members upon discharge or resignation; deferred retirement; preretirement death; forfeitures. (a) Any member who terminates covered employment and is not eligible to receive disability benefits or retirement income payments under this article is, by written request filed with the board, entitled to receive from the fund the member’s accumulated contributions. Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, on withdrawal, the member shall forfeit his or her accrued benefit and cease to be a member.(b)(1) Any member who ceases employment in covered employment and active participation in this plan and who thereafter becomes reemployed in covered employment may not receive any credited service for any prior accumulated contributions withdrawn from the plan unless following his or her return to covered employment and active participation in this plan, the member redeposits in the fund the amount of the accumulated contributions withdrawn from previous covered employment, together with interest on the accumulated contributions at the rate determined by the board from the date of withdrawal to the date of redeposit. On repayment he or she shall receive the same credit on account of his or her former covered employment as if no refund had been made.(2) The repayment authorized by this subsection shall be made in a lump sum within 60 months of the police officer’s or firefighter’s reemployment in covered employment.(c) Every member who completes 60 months of regular contributory service may, on cessation of covered employment, either withdraw his or her accumulated contributions in accordance with this section or choose not to withdraw his or her accumulated contribution and receive retirement income payments, if eligible, on attaining normal retirement age.(d) If a member dies from any cause other than those specified in §8-22A-20 of this code and does not have 10 or more years of contributory service, the member’s accumulated contributions may be paid to a named beneficiary or beneficiaries. If no beneficiary is named, then the accumulated contributions shall be paid to the estate of the deceased member.(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, forfeitures under the plan may not be applied to increase the benefits any member would otherwise receive under the plan.(f) Special consideration shall be given for municipalities to join the Municipal Police Officers & Firefighters Retirement System (MPFRS) for their paid firefighters. §8-22A-33.  Special authorization for municipal police or firefighters hired after July 1, 2015. (a) Notwithstanding any provision of this code to the contrary, any municipality or municipal subdivision that employs individuals as members of paid police departments or paid fire departments, but did not establish either a municipal policemen’s pension and relief fund or a municipal firemen’s pension and relief fund as provided in section sixteen, article twenty-two of this chapter and whose current police officers or firefighters are participating in the Public Employees Retirement System may elect, in the same manner as provided in section twenty-eight of this article, to become a participating public employer in the plan and thereby include its police officers and firefighters in the membership of the plan subject to the restrictions provided in this section.(b) The municipality or municipal subdivision may elect to include only police officers and firefighters who have been hired on or after July 1, 2015, to become members of the plan.  Police officers and firefighters hired before July 1, 2015, will remain members of the Public Employees Retirement System.(c) The municipality or municipal subdivision must make its election on or prior to July 1, 2017.(d) Once a municipality or municipal subdivision makes its election to become a participating public employer pursuant to this section and section twenty-eight of this article, all police officers and firefighters hired by the municipality or municipal subdivision after the date of election shall be members of the plan: Provided, That police officers and firefighters hired by the municipality or municipal subdivision on or after July 1, 2015, who are members of the Public Employees Retirement System, may choose to become a member of the plan by notifying the municipality or municipal subdivision on a form provided by the Consolidated Public Retirement Board:  Provided, however, That he or she make this decision within ninety days of the municipality or municipal subdivision’s decision to participate in the plan.  A municipality or municipal subdivision making an election to become a participating public employer pursuant to section twenty-eight of this article that has hired any police officer or firefighter on or after July 1, 2015, shall notify each police officer or firefighter hired on or after July 1, 2015, of its election to become a participating public employer within thirty days of making the election.  This notice shall include instructions as to how a police officer or firefighter may make notification to the municipality or municipal subdivision of his or her decision to become a member in the plan. The municipality or municipal subdivision shall notify the Consolidated Public Retirement Board in writing of any police officer or firefighter hired after July 1, 2015, who has decided to become a member of the plan and terminate his or her membership in the Public Employees Retirement System within thirty days of notification by the police officer or firefighter on forms provided by the Consolidated Public Retirement System.(e) Special consideration shall be given for municipalities to join the Municipal Police Officers & Firefighters Retirement System (MPFRS) for their paid firefighters. §8-22A-33a. Second special authorization for municipal police or firefighters hired after July 1, 2015. (a) Notwithstanding any provision of this code to the contrary, any municipality or municipal subdivision that employs individuals as members of paid police departments or paid fire departments and whose current police officers or firefighters are participating in the Public Employees Retirement System may elect, as provided in same manner as provided in §8-22A-28(a) of this code, to become a participating public employer in the plan and thereby include its police officers and firefighters in the membership of the plan subject to the restrictions provided in this section.(b) The municipality or municipal subdivision may elect to include only police officers or firefighters who have been hired on or after July 1, 2015, to become members of the plan. Police officers or firefighters hired before July 1, 2015, will remain members of the Public Employees Retirement System.(c) The municipality or municipal subdivision must make its election on or prior to July 1, 2025.(d) Once a municipality or municipal subdivision makes its election to become a participating public employer pursuant to this section, all police officers or firefighters hired by the municipality or municipal subdivision after the date of election shall be members of the plan: Provided, That police officers or firefighters hired by the municipality or municipal subdivision on or after July 1, 2015, who are members of the Public Employees Retirement System, may choose to become a member of the plan by notifying the municipality or municipal subdivision on a form provided by the Consolidated Public Retirement Board: Provided, however, That he or she make this decision within 90 days of the municipality or municipal subdivision's decision to participate in the plan. A municipality or municipal subdivision making an election to become a participating public employer pursuant to this section that has hired any police officer or firefighter on or after July 1, 2015, shall notify each police officer or firefighter hired on or after July 1, 2015, of its election to become a participating public employer within 30 days of making the election. This notice shall include instructions as to how a police officer or firefighter may make notification to the municipality or municipal subdivision of his or her decision to become a member in the plan. The municipality or municipal subdivision shall notify the Consolidated Public Retirement Board in writing of any police officer or firefighter hired after July 1, 2015, who has decided to become a member of the plan and terminate his or her membership in the Public Employees Retirement System within 30 days of notification by the police officer or firefighter on forms provided by the Consolidated Public Retirement System.(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of the code to the contrary, any police officer or firefighter hired by a participating public employer on or after July 1, 2015, who chooses pursuant to this section to be a member of the plan, shall be a member of the plan upon acceptance by the Consolidated Public Retirement Board of the notification by the municipality required by this section.(1) The Consolidated Public Retirement Board shall transfer assets and service credit earned on or after July 1, 2015, from the Public Employees Retirement System Trust Fund into the West Virginia Municipal Police Officers and Firefighters Retirement Fund for those police officers or firefighters who elect to be a member of the plan and were members in the Public Employees Retirement System no later than 60 days from receipt of notification by the municipality or municipal subdivision of the police officer or firefighter's election to become a member. The amount of service credit recognized by the plan for the transferring employees shall be the service credit transferred and recognized by the Public Employees Retirement System.(2) The amount of assets to be transferred for each police officer or firefighter shall be computed as of the actuarial valuation date preceding the notification to the Consolidated Public Retirement Board by the municipality or municipal subdivision of the police officer or firefighter's election to become a member and updated with seven and one-half percent annual interest to the date of the actual asset transfer. For purposes of this section, the actuarial valuation date is the most recent actuarial valuation of the Public Employees Retirement System approved by the Consolidated Public Retirement Board. The market value of the assets of the transferring employees in the Public Employees Retirement System shall be determined as of the end of the month preceding the actual transfer. To determine the computation of the asset share to be transferred, the Consolidated Public Retirement Board shall:(A) Compute the market value of the Public Employees Retirement System assets using the actuarial valuation date;(B) Compute the actuarial accrued liabilities for all Public Employees Retirement System retirees, beneficiaries, disabled retirees, and terminated inactive members using the actuarial valuation date:(C) Compute the market value of active member assets in the Public Employees Retirement System as of the actuarial valuation date by reducing the assets value under paragraph (A) of this subdivision by the inactive liabilities under paragraph (B) of this subdivision;(D) Compute the actuarial accrued liability for all active Public Employees Retirement System members using the actuarial valuation date immediately preceding the computation date;(E) Compute the funded percentage of the active members' actuarial accrued liabilities under the Public Employees Retirement System as of the actuarial valuation date by dividing the active members' market value of assets under paragraph (C) of this subdivision by the active members' actuarial accrued liabilities under paragraph (D) of this subsection;(F) Compute the actuarial accrued liabilities under the Public Employees Retirement System as of the actuarial valuation date for active employees transferring to the plan;(G) Determine the assets to be transferred from the Public Employees Retirement System to the plan by multiplying the active members' funded percentage determined under paragraph (E) of this subdivision by the transferring active members' actuarial accrued liabilities under the Public Employees Retirement System under paragraph (F) of this subdivision and adjusting the asset transfer amount by interest at seven and five-tenths percent for the period from the calculation date of July 1 through the first day of the month in which the asset transfer is to be completed.(3) Any police officer or firefighter who elects to become a member of the plan must also pay to the plan a four percent contribution no later than June 30, 2027. The contribution shall be calculated as four percent of the member's total earnings for which assets are transferred, plus interest of seven and one-half percent accumulated from the date of the police officer's or firefighter's initial participation in the Public Employees Retirement System through the calculation date. Installment payments may be made over no more than a 24-month period plus seven and one-half percent interest shall accrue on the outstanding balance due from the calculation date until paid in full. Any police officer or firefighter who elects to become a member of the plan but fails to timely pay the required four percent contribution and interest will have all years of service in the plan transferred to the Public Employees Retirement System no later than December 31, 2027. The assets previously transferred to the plan shall be returned to the Public Employees Retirement System, in addition to the employee and employer contribution amounts that would have been paid had the member not elected to transfer, plus interest of seven and one-half percent per annum. Any remaining excess employee contribution amount paid to the plan since the date of transfer shall remain in the plan until the employee terminates employment with the municipality.  (4) Once an employee transfers from the Public Employees Retirement System to the plan, the Public Employees Retirement System shall bar any further liability and said transfer will constitute an agreement whereby the transferring employee forever indemnifies and holds harmless the Public Employees Retirement System from providing him or her any form of retirement benefit whatsoever until that employee obtains other employment which would make him or her eligible to reenter the Public Employees Retirement System with no credit whatsoever for the amounts transferred to the plan.(f) Special consideration shall be given for municipalities to join the Municipal Police Officers & Firefighters Retirement System (MPFRS) for their paid firefighters.